Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-309 Notice. (a) A copy of a
petition for guardianship and notice of the hearing on the petition shall be
served personally on the respondent. The notice shall include a statement that
the respondent must be physically present unless excused by the court, inform
the respondent of the respondent's rights at the hearing, and include a
description of the nature, purpose, and consequences of an appointment. A
failure to serve the respondent with a notice substantially complying with this
subsection shall preclude the court from granting the petition.

(b) In a proceeding to establish a
guardianship, notice of the hearing shall be given to the persons listed in the
petition. For good cause, the court may waive notice to any person listed in
the petition other than the respondent, upon a showing that all reasonable
efforts have been made to ascertain the identity and address of the person or
to effect notice, that the efforts were unsuccessful, and that further efforts
should not be required because that person has not demonstrated a reasonable
degree of interest in or concern about the respondent. Failure to give notice
under this subsection shall not preclude the appointment of a guardian or the
making of a protective order.

(c) Notice of the hearing on a petition for an
order after appointment of a guardian, together with a copy of the petition,
shall be given to the ward, the guardian, and any other person the court
directs.

(d) A guardian shall give notice of the filing
of the guardian's report, together with a copy of the report, to the ward and
any other person the court directs. The notice shall be delivered or sent
within fourteen days after the filing of the report. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next